Massachusetts, session 194th, S987.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 21 of chapter 40B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting the following paragraph:- 
“Any town consisting of less than 30,000 in population shall be exempt from all rules and 
restrictions currently applicable. Said communities shall not be compelled or forced in any way, 
shape or manner by the Commonwealth to accept legislation which mandates and accommodates 
any form of chapter 40B housing projects unless the project receives approval of no less than a 
seventy percent favorable vote of the registered voters at a town election or general election of 
said community. Any chapter 40B proposed projects in the Commonwealth involving towns or 
cities having less than 30,000 in population shall be held in ‘suspension or abeyance’ until such 
time as this proposed legislation can be decided by the general court”.